Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.45, is amended to read: 244.45 INELIGIBILITY FOR EARNED INCENTIVE RELEASE CREDIT. The following individuals are ineligible for earned incentive release credit: (1) those serving life sentences; (2) those given indeterminate sentences for crimes committed on or before April 30, 1980; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) those subject to good time under section 244.04 or similar lawsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) those serving sentences for labor trafficking under section 609.282; unlawful conduct with respect to documents in furtherance of labor or sex trafficking under section 609.283; a prostitution or sex trafficking offense under section 609.322; first through fifth degree criminal sexual conduct under sections 609.342 to 609.3451; criminal sexual predatory conduct under section 609.3453; or sexual extortion under section 609.3458. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.46, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Applicability. This section does not apply to individuals: (1) serving life sentences; (2) given indeterminate sentences for crimes committed on or before April 30, 1980; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) subject to good time under section 244.04 or similar lawsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) serving sentences for labor trafficking under section 609.282; unlawful conduct with respect to documents in furtherance of labor or sex trafficking under section 609.283; a prostitution or sex trafficking offense under section 609.322; first through fifth degree criminal sexual conduct under sections 609.342 to 609.3451; criminal sexual predatory conduct under section 609.3453; or sexual extortion under section 609.3458. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end